Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5232.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 3a. (1) Subject to the military leave for first responders act, a local unit of government may provide by ordinance or resolution or through personnel policy a differential pay program or for a specific number of paid days of leave for employees of the local unit of government who request or are required to take a leave of absence to enter into active service in a uniformed service as those terms are defined in section 3. (2) As used in this section: (a) âDifferential pay programâ means a program through which the local unit of government agrees to pay during the leave of absence all or a part of the difference between the amount the employee is paid by the local unit of government and the amount the employee receives through the employeeâs uniformed service if the amount paid by the local unit of government exceeds the amount paid by the uniformed service. (b) âLocal unit of governmentâ means a city, village, township, or county. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5233 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor